Utah statutes.
78A-5-108.   Duties of the clerk of the district court.

The clerk of the district court shall:

(1)  take charge of and safely keep the court seal;

(2)  take charge of and safely keep or dispose of all books, papers, and records filed or deposited with the clerk, and all other records required by law or the rules of the Judicial Council;

(3)  issue all notices, processes, and summonses as authorized by law;

(4)  keep a record of all proceedings, actions, orders, judgments, and decrees of the court;

(5)  take and certify acknowledgments and administer oaths;

(6)  supervise the deputy clerks as required to perform the duties of the clerk's office; and

(7)  perform other duties as required by the presiding judge, the court executive, applicable law, and the rules of the Judicial Council.

